Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.170.080

Grants—Substance abuse intervention.

(1) Grants provided under RCW 28A.170.090 may be used solely for services provided by a substance abuse intervention specialist or for dedicated staff time for counseling and intervention services provided by any school district certificated employee who has been trained by and has access to consultation with a substance abuse intervention specialist. Services shall be directed at assisting students in kindergarten through twelfth grade in overcoming problems of drug and alcohol abuse, and in preventing abuse and addiction to such substances, including nicotine. The grants shall require local matching funds so that the grant amounts support a maximum of eighty percent of the costs of the services funded. The services of a substance abuse intervention specialist may be obtained by means of a contract with a state or community services agency or a drug treatment center. Services provided by a substance abuse intervention specialist may include:

(a) Individual and family counseling, including preventive counseling;

(b) Assessment and referral for treatment;

(c) Referral to peer support groups;

(d) Aftercare;

(e) Development and supervision of student mentor programs;

(f) Staff training, including training in the identification of high-risk children and effective interaction with those children in the classroom; and

(g) Development and coordination of school drug and alcohol core teams, involving staff, students, parents, and community members.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "substance abuse intervention specialist" means any one of the following, except that diagnosis and assessment, counseling and aftercare specifically identified with treatment of chemical dependency shall be performed only by personnel who meet the same qualifications as are required of a qualified chemical dependency counselor employed by an alcoholism or drug treatment program approved by the department of social and health services.

(a) An educational staff associate employed by a school district or educational service district who holds certification as a school counselor, school psychologist, school nurse, or school social worker under Washington professional educator standards board rules adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.410.210;

(b) An individual who meets the definition of a qualified drug or alcohol counselor established by the bureau of alcohol and substance abuse;

(c) A qualified professional employed by the department of social and health services;

(d) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; or

(e) A children's mental health specialist as defined in RCW 71.34.020.

[ 2011 c 89 s 8; 2005 c 497 s 213; 1990 c 33 s 157; 1989 c 271 s 311. Formerly RCW 28A.120.082.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 89: See note following RCW 18.320.005.

Findings—2011 c 89: See RCW 18.320.005.

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.